Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201458-830
Authority; personnel.

The authority
may employ consulting engineers, architects, attorneys, accountants, trustees,
construction and finance experts, superintendents, managers, and such other
employees and agents as may be necessary in its judgment, and fix their compensation.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 27;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2927;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 27;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1727;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 30.